Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 8
UNLAWFUL ACTS

44-30-801. Limited gaming equipment manufacturers or distributors, operators, associated equipment suppliers, retailers, key employees, support licensees, persons contracting with the commission or division - criteria.

This section applies to the following persons:

All persons licensed pursuant to this article 30;

With respect to privately held corporations licensed pursuant to this article 30, the officers, directors, and stockholders of the corporations;

With respect to publicly traded corporations licensed pursuant to this article 30, all officers, directors, and stockholders holding either five percent or greater interest or a controlling interest;

With respect to partnerships licensed pursuant to this article 30, all general partners and all limited partners;

With respect to any other organization licensed pursuant to this article 30, all those persons connected with the organization having a relationship to it similar to that of an officer, director, or stockholder of a corporation;

All persons contracting with or supplying any goods or service to the commission or the division;

All persons supplying financing or loaning money to any licensee, when the financing or loan is connected with the establishment or operation of limited gaming;

All persons having a contract, lease, or other ongoing financial or business arrangement with any licensee, where the contract, lease, or arrangement relates to limited gaming operations, equipment, devices, or premises.

Each of the persons described in subsection (1) of this section shall be:

A person of good moral character, honesty, and integrity notwithstanding section 24-5-101;

A person whose prior activities, criminal record, reputation, habits, and associations do not pose a threat to the public interests of this state or to the control of gaming or create or enhance the dangers of unsuitable, unfair, or illegal practices, methods, and activities in the conduct of gaming or the carrying-on of the business or financial arrangements incidental to the conduct of gaming;

A person who has not served a sentence upon conviction of any felony, misdemeanor gambling-related offense, misdemeanor theft by deception, or misdemeanor involving fraud or misrepresentation in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department within ten years prior to the date of applying for a license pursuant to this article 30, notwithstanding section 24-5-101;

A person who has not served a sentence upon conviction of any gambling-related felony, felony involving theft by deception, or felony involving fraud or misrepresentation in a correctional facility, city or county jail, or community correctional facility or under the supervision of the state board of parole or any probation department, notwithstanding section 24-5-101;

A person who has not been found to have seriously or repeatedly violated this article 30 or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article 30; and has not knowingly made a false statement of material facts to the commission, its legal counsel, or any employee of the division.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 206, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-801 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-802. False statement on application - violations of rules or provisions of article as felony.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement in any application for a license or in any statement attached to the application, or who provides any false or misleading information to the commission or the division, or who fails to keep books and records to substantiate the receipts, expenses, or uses resulting from limited gaming conducted under this article 30 as prescribed in rules promulgated by the commission, or who falsifies any books or records that relate to any transaction connected with the holding, operating, and conducting of any limited gaming activity, or who knowingly violates any of the provisions of this article 30 or any rule adopted by the commission or any terms of any license granted under this article 30, commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 207, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-802 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-803. Slot machines - shipping notices.

Any slot machine manufacturer or distributor shipping or importing a slot machine into the state of Colorado shall provide to the commission at the time of shipment a copy of the shipping invoice which shall include, at a minimum, the destination, the serial number of each machine, and a description of each machine.
(1) (a) (I) Any slot machine manufacturer or distributor shipping or importing a slot machine into the state of Colorado shall provide to the commission at the time of shipment a copy of the shipping invoice which shall include, at a minimum, the destination, the serial number of each machine, and a description of each machine.

Any person within the state of Colorado receiving a slot machine shall, upon receipt of the machine, provide to the commission upon a form available from the commission information showing at a minimum the location of each machine, its serial number, and description. The report shall be provided regardless of whether the machine is received from a manufacturer or any other person.

Any machine licensed pursuant to this section shall be licensed for a specific location, and movement of the machine from that location shall be reported to the commission in accordance with rules adopted by the commission.

Any person violating any provision of this section commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Any slot machine that is not in compliance with this article 30 is declared contraband and may be summarily seized and destroyed after notice and hearing.

The commission shall promulgate rules setting the time and manner for reporting the movement of any slot machine.

Slot machines that because of age and condition bear no manufacturer serial number shall be assigned a serial number by a remanufacturer of slot machines. The new serial number shall be duly recorded as required by federal regulations.

The director may approve a change to the registration of a slot machine under circumstances constituting an emergency. If the director approves an emergency change, the registration of the slot machine shall not be suspended pending the filing of a supplemental application.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 207, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-803 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-804. Persons prohibited from interest in limited gaming.

None of the following persons shall have any interest, direct or indirect, in any license involved in or with limited gaming:

Officers, reserve police officers, agents, or employees of any law enforcement agency of the state of Colorado with the authority to investigate or prosecute crime in Teller or Gilpin counties or of any local law enforcement agency or detention or correctional facility within Teller or Gilpin counties;

District, county, or municipal court judges whose jurisdiction includes all or any portion of Teller or Gilpin counties;

Elected municipal officials or county commissioners of the counties of Teller and Gilpin and of the cities of Central, Black Hawk, and Cripple Creek;

Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek city manager or planning commission member.

No licensee may employ any person in any capacity while that person is in the employment of the commission or is in the employment of, or has a reserve police officer position with, a law enforcement agency of the state of Colorado with the authority to investigate or prosecute crime in Teller or Gilpin counties, any local law enforcement agency or detention or correctional facility within Teller or Gilpin counties, or any other county that may later be an authorized gaming location under section 44-30-105.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 208, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-804 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-805. Responsibilities of operator.

Every licensed operator and retailer having slot machines on his or her premises shall provide audit and security measures relating to slot machines, as prescribed by this article 30 and by rules of the commission. Every licensed operator and retailer having slot machines on his or her premises shall ensure that the slot machines in his or her establishment comply with the specifications set forth in this article 30 and the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 208, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-805 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-806. Gaming equipment - security and audit specifications.

All slot machines and all other equipment and devices used in limited gaming allowed by this article 30 shall have the features, security provisions, and audit specifications established in rules adopted by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 208, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-806 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-807. Gaming equipment - not subject to exclusive agreements.

It is the public policy of this state that gaming equipment authorized and approved by the commission may not be subject to any exclusive agreement entered into prior to October 1, 1991.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 209, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-807 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-808. Restriction upon persons having financial interest in retail licenses.

No person may have an ownership interest in more than three retail licenses. The interest of a licensed operator leasing or routing slot machines in return for a percentage of the income from limited gaming shall not by itself be considered an interest in a retail license under this section.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 209, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-808 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-809. Age of participants - penalties - applicability.

It is unlawful for any person who is less than twenty-one years of age to participate, play, be allowed to play, place wagers, or collect winnings, whether personally or through an agent, in or from any limited gaming game or slot machines.

It is unlawful for any person to engage in limited gaming with, or to share proceeds from limited gaming with, any person under twenty-one years of age.

It is unlawful for any licensee to permit any person who is less than twenty-one years of age to participate, play, place wagers, or collect winnings, whether personally or through an agent, in or from any limited gaming game or slot machine.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section is subject to the following civil and criminal penalties:

For a first offense, a civil penalty of five hundred dollars;

For a second offense, a civil penalty of one thousand dollars; and

For a third or subsequent offense, the person shall be charged with a class 2 misdemeanor and punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this section with a person under eighteen years of age may also be proceeded against pursuant to section 18-6-701 for contributing to the delinquency of a minor.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 209, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1), (3), and (4) amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2878, § 16, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-809 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-810. Employee twenty-one years or older required on premises.

A retail licensee shall have one employee who is at least twenty-one years of age on the premises during the hours limited gaming is conducted and within full view and control of any limited gaming activity conducted on the premises pursuant to the license obtained.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-810 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-811. Persons conducting limited gaming.

A person under eighteen years of age shall not:

Be employed as a gaming employee;

Conduct, or assist in conducting, any limited gaming activity; or

Manage or handle any of the proceeds from limited gaming.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1412), ch. 405, p. 2875, § 5, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-811 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-812. Employee of licensed person - good moral character.

No person licensed under this article 30 shall employ or be assisted by any person who is not of good moral character.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-812 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-813. Minimum payback - limit to a slot machine.

The minimum theoretical payback value on a slot machine shall be at least eighty but not more than one hundred percent of the value of any credit played. However, this section shall not be construed to prohibit tournament slot machines with theoretical payback values greater than one hundred percent where the machines do not accept nor pay out coins or tokens.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-813 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-814. Key employee - support license.

A licensee shall not employ any person to work in the field of limited gaming, or to handle any of the proceeds of limited gaming, unless the person holds a valid key employee or support license issued by the commission.

It is unlawful for any person holding a key employee or support license to participate in limited gaming in the gaming establishment where the licensee is employed or in any other gaming establishment owned by the licensee's employer; except that the licensee may participate in limited gaming if the participation is performed as part of the licensee's employment responsibilities.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-814 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-815. Extension of credit prohibited.

No person licensed under this article 30 may extend credit to another person for participation in limited gaming.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 210, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-815 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-816. Authorized amount of bets.

The amount of a bet made pursuant to this article 30 shall not be more, on the initial bet or subsequent bet, than the amounts approved by the voters of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek at a local election held in each city to control the conduct of gaming in that jurisdiction, subject to rules promulgated by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

Initiated 2020:

Entire section amended, Amendment 77, effective May 1, 2021. See L. 2021, p. 4211.

44-30-817. Failure to pay winners.

It is unlawful for any licensee to willfully refuse to pay the winner of any limited gaming game, except as authorized by section 44-33-105 (2)(b)(II).

Any person violating any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3329, § 791, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-817 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-818. Approval of rules for certain games.

Specific rules for blackjack, poker, craps, roulette, and such other games as are approved by the voters of Central, Black Hawk, or Cripple Creek at a local election held in each city to control the conduct of gaming in that jurisdiction shall be approved by the commission and clearly posted within plain view of the games.

A licensee shall not offer poker, blackjack, craps, or roulette, or any variation game of poker, blackjack, craps, or roulette, without prior approval of the game by the commission, except as specifically authorized in the commission's rules regarding field trials of new games or technology.

No licensee shall employ shills.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

Initiated 2020:

(1) amended, Amendment 77, effective May 1, 2021. See L. 2021, p. 4211.

44-30-819. Exchange - redemption of chips - unlawful acts.

It is unlawful for a person to exchange or redeem chips for anything whatsoever, except currency, negotiable personal checks, negotiable counter checks, or other chips. A licensee shall, upon the request of a person, redeem the licensee's gaming chips surrendered by that person pursuant to rules established by the commission.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-819 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-820. Persons in supervisory positions - unlawful acts - rules.

It is unlawful for a dealer, floorperson, or other employee who serves in a supervisory position to solicit or accept a tip or gratuity from a player or patron at the licensed gaming establishment where he or she is employed; except that a dealer may accept tips or gratuities from a patron at the table at which the dealer is conducting play, subject to this section. Except as the commission may authorize by rule, a dealer shall immediately deposit tips or gratuities in a lockbox reserved for that purpose, accounted for and placed in a pool for distribution based upon criteria established in advance by the licensed retailer.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-820 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-821. Cheating - definition.

It is unlawful for any person, whether he or she is an owner or employee of, or a player in, an establishment, to cheat at any limited gaming activity.

For purposes of this article 30, "cheating" means to alter the selection of criteria that determine:

The result of a game; or

The amount or frequency of payment in a game.

Any person issued a license pursuant to this article 30 violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, and any other person violating any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. If the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 211, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(3) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3329, § 792, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-822 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-822. Fraudulent acts.

It is unlawful for a person:

To alter or misrepresent the outcome of a game or other event on which wagers have been made after the outcome is made sure but before it is revealed to the players;

To place, increase, or decrease a bet or to determine the course of play after acquiring knowledge, not available to all players, of the outcome of the game or any event that affects the outcome of the game or that is the subject of the bet or to aid anyone in acquiring the knowledge for the purpose of placing, increasing, or decreasing a bet or determining the course of play contingent upon that event or outcome;

To claim, collect, or take, or attempt to claim, collect, or take, money or anything of value in or from a limited gaming activity with intent to defraud and without having made a wager contingent thereon, or to claim, collect, or take an amount greater than the amount won;

Knowingly to entice or induce another to go to any place where limited gaming is being conducted or operated in violation of the provisions of this article 30, with the intent that the other person play or participate in that limited gaming activity;

To place or increase a bet after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the bet, including past-posting and pressing bets;

To reduce the amount wagered or to cancel a bet after acquiring knowledge of the outcome of the game or other event that is the subject of the bet, including pinching bets;

To manipulate, with the intent to cheat, any component of a gaming device in a manner contrary to the designed and normal operational purpose for the component, with knowledge that the manipulation affects the outcome of the game or with knowledge of an event that affects the outcome of the game;

To, by any trick or sleight of hand performance, or by fraud or fraudulent scheme, cards, or device, for himself or herself or another, win or attempt to win money or property or a representative of either or reduce a losing wager or attempt to reduce a losing wager in connection with limited gaming;

To conduct any limited gaming operation without a valid license;

To conduct any limited gaming operation on an unlicensed premises;

To permit any limited gaming game or slot machine to be conducted, operated, dealt, or carried on in any limited gaming premises by a person other than a person licensed for the premises pursuant to this article 30;

To place any limited gaming games or slot machines into play or display the games or slot machines without the authorization of the commission;

To employ or continue to employ any person in a limited gaming operation who is not duly licensed or registered in a position whose duties require a license or registration pursuant to this article 30; or

To, without first obtaining the requisite license or registration pursuant to this article 30, be employed, work, or otherwise act in a position whose duties would require licensing or registration pursuant to this article 30.

Any person issued a license pursuant to this article 30 violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, and any other person violating any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. If the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 212, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3330, § 793, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-823 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-823. Use of device for calculating probabilities.

It is unlawful for any person at a licensed gaming establishment to use, or possess with the intent to use, any device to assist:

In projecting the outcome of the game;

In keeping track of the cards played;

In analyzing the probability of the occurrence of an event relating to the game; or

In analyzing the strategy for playing or betting to be used in the game, except as permitted by the commission.

Any person issued a license pursuant to this article 30 violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, and any other person violating any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. If the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 213, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3330, § 794, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-824 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-824. Use of counterfeit or unapproved chips or tokens or unlawful coins or devices - possession of certain unlawful devices, equipment, products, or materials.

It is unlawful for any licensee, employee, or other person to use counterfeit chips in any limited gaming activity.

It is unlawful for a person, in playing or using a limited gaming activity designed to be played with, to receive, or to be operated by chips, tokens, or other wagering instruments approved by the commission or by lawful coin of the United States of America:

Knowingly to use anything other than chips or tokens approved by the commission or lawful coin, legal tender of the United States of America, or to use coin not of the same denomination as the coin intended to be used in that limited gaming activity; or

To use any device or means to violate the provisions of this article 30.

It is unlawful for any person to possess any device, equipment, or material that he or she knows has been manufactured, distributed, sold, tampered with, or serviced in violation of the provisions of this article 30.

It is unlawful for any person, not a duly authorized employee of a licensee acting in furtherance of his or her employment within an establishment, to have on his or her person or in his or her possession any device intended to be used to violate the provisions of this article 30.

It is unlawful for any person, not a duly authorized employee of a licensee acting in furtherance of his or her employment within an establishment, to have on his or her person or in his or her possession while on the premises of any licensed gaming establishment any key or device known to have been designed for the purpose of and suitable for opening, entering, or affecting the operation of any limited gaming activity, drop box, or electronic or mechanical device connected thereto, or for removing money or other contents therefrom.

Possession of more than one of the devices, equipment, products, or materials described in this section shall give rise to a rebuttable presumption that the possessor intended to use them for cheating.

It is unlawful for any person to use or possess while on the premises any cheating or thieving device, including but not limited to, tools, drills, wires, coins, or tokens attached to strings or wires or electronic or magnetic devices, to facilitate the alignment of any winning combination or to facilitate removing from any slot machine any money or contents thereof, unless the person is a duly authorized gaming employee acting in the furtherance of his or her employment.

Any person violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401; except that, if the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 213, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-825 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-825. Cheating game and devices.

It is unlawful for a person playing a licensed game in licensed gaming premises to:

Knowingly conduct, carry on, operate, or deal or allow to be conducted, carried on, operated, or dealt any cheating or thieving game or device; or

Knowingly deal, conduct, carry on, operate, or expose for play a physical or electronic version of a game played with physical or electronic cards or a mechanical device, or any combination of games or devices, that have been marked or tampered with or placed in a condition or operated in a manner that tends to deceive the public or alter the normal random selection of characteristics or the normal chance of the game, or that could determine or alter the result of the game.

Any person violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401; except that, if the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 214, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-826 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-826. Unlawful manufacture, sale, distribution, marking, altering, or modification of equipment and devices associated with limited gaming - unlawful instruction.

It is unlawful to manufacture, sell, or distribute any cards, chips, dice, game, or device that is intended to be used to violate any provision of this article 30.

It is unlawful to mark, alter, or otherwise modify related equipment or a limited gaming device in a manner that:

Affects the result of a wager by determining win or loss; or

Alters the normal criteria of random selection, that affects the operation of a game or that determines the outcome of a game.

It is unlawful for any person to instruct another in cheating or in the use of any device for that purpose, with the knowledge or intent that the information or use so conveyed may be employed to violate any provision of this article 30.

Any person issued a license pursuant to this article 30 violating any provision of this section commits a class 6 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401, and any other person violating any provision of this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501. If the person is a repeating gambling offender, the person commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 215, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(4) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3330, § 795, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-827 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-827. Unlawful entry by excluded and ejected persons.

It is unlawful for any person whose name is on the list promulgated by the commission pursuant to section 44-30-1703 (3) or (4) to enter the licensed premises of a limited gaming licensee.

It is unlawful for any person whose name is on the list promulgated by the commission pursuant to section 44-30-1703 (3) or (4) to have any personal pecuniary interest, direct or indirect, in any limited gaming licensee, licensed premises, establishment, or business involved in or with limited gaming or in the shares in any corporation, association, or firm licensed pursuant to this article 30.

Any person violating the provisions of this section commits a class 5 felony and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-401.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 215, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2022:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 22-1402), ch. 402, p. 2870, § 12, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-828 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-828. Detention and questioning of person suspected of violating article - limitations on liability - posting of notice.

Any licensee or an officer, employee, or agent thereof may question any person in the licensee's establishment suspected of violating any of the provisions of this article 30. A licensee or any officer, employee, or agent thereof is not criminally or civilly liable:

On account of any such questioning; or

For reporting to the division, commission, or law enforcement authorities the person suspected of the violation.

Any licensee or any officer, employee, or agent thereof who has probable cause to believe that there has been a violation of this article 30 in the licensee's establishment by any person may take that person into custody and detain him or her in the establishment in a reasonable manner and for a reasonable length of time. Such a taking into custody and detention does not render the licensee or the officer, employee, or agent thereof criminally or civilly liable unless it is established by clear and convincing evidence that the taking into custody or detention is unreasonable under all the circumstances.

A licensee or any officer, employee, or agent thereof is not entitled to the immunity from liability provided for in subsection (2) of this section unless there is displayed in a conspicuous place in the licensee's establishment a notice in bold-face type clearly legible and in substantially this form:

Any gaming licensee, or any officer, employee, or agent thereof who has probable cause to believe that any person has violated any provision prohibiting cheating in limited gaming may detain that person in the establishment.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 216, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-829 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-829. Failure to display operator and premises licenses.

It is unlawful for any person to fail to permanently display in a conspicuous manner:

Operator and premises licenses granted by the commission;

A notice in bold-faced type that is clearly legible and in substantially the following form:

IT IS UNLAWFUL FOR ANY PERSON UNDER THE AGE OF TWENTY-ONE TO ENGAGE IN LIMITED GAMING.

Any person violating this section commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 216, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-830 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-830. Authority, duties, and powers - department of revenue and department of public safety.

The gaming commission, the department of revenue, and the division shall regulate the gaming industry and enforce the gaming laws. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit or limit the authority of local sheriffs or police officers to enforce all the provisions of this article 30 or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 30.

The Colorado bureau of investigation shall have authority for the following:

Conduct criminal investigations and law enforcement oversight relating to violations of the "Colorado Organized Crime Control Act", article 17 of title 18, as these violations are reported by law enforcement officials, the gaming commission, the governor, or as discovered by the Colorado bureau of investigation.

In cooperation with local law enforcement officials and the commission, the Colorado bureau of investigation shall develop and collect information with regard to organized crime in an effort to identify criminal elements or enterprises that might infiltrate and influence limited gaming and report the information to appropriate law enforcement organizations and the limited gaming commission.

Prepare reports concerning any activities in, or movements into, this state of organized crime for use by the commission or the governor in their efforts to prevent and thwart criminal elements or enterprises from infiltrating or influencing limited gaming as defined in this article 30.

Inspect or examine, during normal business hours, premises, equipment, books, records, or other written material maintained at gaming establishments as required by this article 30, in the course of performing the activities of the Colorado bureau of investigation as set forth in this section.

The commission shall, in cooperation with the Colorado bureau of investigation, conduct background investigations of gaming license applicants, licensees, owners or tenants of property or premises upon which gaming is permitted or conducted, and key employees of the gaming establishments as defined in this article 30 or by commission rule.

Criminal violations of this article 30 discovered during an authorized investigation or discovered by the limited gaming commission shall be referred to the appropriate district attorney.

The director of the Colorado bureau of investigation shall employ any personnel that may be necessary to carry out the duties and responsibilities set forth in this article 30. The commission shall authorize payment to the Colorado bureau of investigation for the cost involved. Costs for activities relating to limited gaming shall be paid from the limited gaming fund pursuant to preestablished contracts or formal agreements, or both, including contracts or formal agreements on specific activities the department of public safety will complete for the commission and conditions for payment, the manner in which the commission and the department of public safety will review budgets and project resource needs in the future, and the level of cooperation established between the division, the Colorado bureau of investigation for conducting background investigations, and the Colorado state patrol for contracted services.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 216, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-831 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-831. Violation of article as misdemeanor.

Any person violating any of the provisions of this article 30, or any of the rules promulgated pursuant thereto, commits a class 2 misdemeanor and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-501, except as may otherwise be specifically provided in this article 30.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3330, § 796, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-832 as it existed prior to 2018.

44-30-832. Agreements, contracts, leases - void and unenforceable.

All agreements, contracts, leases, or arrangements in violation of this article 30, or the rules promulgated pursuant to this article 30, are void and unenforceable.

Source:

L. 2018:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 18-034), ch. 14, p. 218, § 2, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 12-47.1-833 as it existed prior to 2018.